Utah statutes.
73-10-21.   Loans for water systems -- Eligible projects.
This chapter shall apply to all eligible projects of incorporated cities and
towns,  local districts under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government
Entities - Local Districts, assessment areas under Title 11, Chapter 42,
Assessment Area Act, and special service districts under Title 17D, Chapter 1,
Special Service District Act.  Eligible projects are those for the
acquisition, improvement, or construction of water systems used for the
production, supply, transmission, storage, distribution, or treatment of water
for cities, towns, metropolitan water districts, water conservancy districts,
improvement districts, special improvement districts, or special service
districts, or the improvement or extension of such systems.
